Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 38

Livestock Running at Large or Straying

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Cross References. Animals prohibited from running at large in cities or towns, impounding, §14-54-1101.

Method of publication of advertisements, §16-3-101.

Records of strays to be kept at each county site in counties having two political districts, §14-15-901.

Effective Dates. Acts 1840, p. 94, § 4: effective on passage.

Acts 1845, p. 100, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1846, p. 28, § 9: effective on passage.

Acts 1875, No. 50, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1883, No. 121, § 4: effective on passage.

Acts 1893, No. 12, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1897, No. 40, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1901, No. 204, § 2: effective on passage.

2-38-101. Taking up animals.

Every citizen, a resident householder in any county in this state, on finding any horse, mare, mule, jack, or jenny or any domesticated bovine, hog, or sheep, of any age running at large, the owner of which is not known, may take the animal into his or her custody.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 58, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 268; Pope's Dig., § 282; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1101; Acts 2019, No. 378, § 7.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “bovine, hog” for “cattle, hogs”.

2-38-102. Range animals.

No person shall take up any domesticated cattle, hogs, or sheep running in the range, unless they shall be found within his or her enclosure, from April 1 until November 1.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 58, § 19; C. & M. Dig., § 269; Pope's Dig., § 283; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1102.

2-38-103. Place of taking.

No person shall take up any stray animal, except on his or her own farm or in his or her immediate vicinity.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 58, § 23; C. & M. Dig., § 270; Pope's Dig., § 284; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1103.

2-38-104. Duty and rights of taker-up or impounder.

Every person taking up any stray animal shall immediately, if the animal is marked or branded, proceed to the office of the clerk of the county court of the county in which the animal is taken up and shall cause the clerk to examine the State Brand Book.

If it is found that the mark or brand upon the animal taken up is entered upon the book, the taker-up or impounder of the animal shall at once notify the owner of the mark or brand, of his or her having taken up the animal, giving an exact description thereof.

The taker-up or impounder of an animal shall receive a reasonable compensation for his or her trouble.

If the animal is taken from the range where the stock of the owner is accustomed to be kept, the taker-up or impounder shall receive nothing.

No person shall use, work, or exercise any acts of ownership over any animal taken up by him or her until he or she shall have given notice thereof to the county court clerk. However, he or she may ride the animal to the county court for the purpose of giving the notice to the clerk.

In a prosecution for larceny of the animals of another, one may set up as a defense his or her effort to comply with the stray laws; where such laws are not complied with, that fact may be considered by jury in determining whether accused took the animals with a felonious intent. Blackshare v. State, 94 Ark. 548, 128 S.W. 549 (1910).

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 58, §§ 2, 24; Acts 1875, No. 50, § 1, p. 130; 1883, No. 121, § 1, p. 298; C. & M. Dig., §§ 271, 296; Pope's Dig., §§ 285, 310; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-1104, 78-1130.

2-38-105. Certificate of examination.

Upon the taker-up of any animal causing examination of the State Brand Book to be made by the county clerk as prescribed in §2-38-104, the county clerk shall give to the impounder a certificate of the examination having been made, setting out in the certificate the description of the animal and the marks and brands, or either thereof, and the impounder shall pay the clerk twenty-five cents (25¢) as a fee for the certificate.

History.

Acts 1883, No. 121, § 2, p. 298; C. & M. Dig., § 272; Pope's Dig., § 286; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1105.

2-38-106. Posting description of animal.

Upon failure to find any record of the mark or brand of the animal taken up or when the person in whose name the mark or brand is found recorded proves not to be the owner of the animal, the taker-up or impounder of the animal shall put or cause to be put up posters in three (3) of the most public places in the township or neighborhood where the animal is taken up, giving a full detailed description of the animal, stating the marks, age, color, and value of the animal. At the same time, the taker-up or impounder shall deliver to the clerk of the county court a copy of the poster, and the clerk shall at once enter a full copy of the poster in a book to be kept by him or her for that purpose and shall set up the poster upon the courthouse door.

If, at the expiration of ten (10) days from the date of the poster, the animal has not been proved away, it shall be the duty of the impounder to give notice to the nearest justice of the peace of the county of the taking up of the animal. The impounder shall, at the time of giving notice, file with the justice of the peace the certificate of the clerk of the county court of the examination of the record of marks and brands if the animal taken up is marked or branded.

If the animal should be proved away as provided in this section, it shall be the duty of the person proving away the animal to pay a reasonable charge for feeding and advertising the animal if the animal has not been used by the person taking it up. In this case no charge shall be made for feeding and advertising.

History.

Acts 1883, No. 121, § 3, p. 298; C. & M. Dig., §§ 273, 274; Pope's Dig., §§ 287, 288; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1106.

2-38-107. Oath of taker-up.

In addition to the notice required by law to be given to a county clerk of taking up of strays, it shall be the duty of the taker-up, at the time of giving the notice, to take also an oath before the clerk that the stray was taken up on the farm of the person, or in his or her immediate vicinity, and that he or she had no agency in bringing the stray into the vicinity.

History.

Acts 1840, § 1, p. 94; C. & M. Dig., § 275, Pope's Dig., § 289; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1107.

2-38-108. Certificate of appraisement.

Every justice of the peace, on receiving notice of any animal being taken up, shall forthwith appoint three (3) appraisers, who shall be citizen householders of the county, to appraise and describe the animal.

The appraisers appointed shall, as soon as practicable, proceed to view the animal and make out a detailed description, stating the marks, brands, age, color, stature, and value thereof, which description and valuation shall be signed by the appraisers and sworn to before the justice appointing them.

For their services, they shall each receive the sum of fifty cents (50¢).

The description and valuation so sworn to shall be delivered by the appraisers to the justice of the peace, who shall deliver to the person taking up the animal a copy thereof.

The original of the certificate of appraisement of the justice shall, within ten (10) days, be deposited into the office of the clerk of the county court of his or her county.

The justice, at the time of depositing the certificate of appraisement with the clerk for record, shall also file with the clerk the bond required by this subchapter, which bond shall be kept by the clerk.

Cross References. Clerk's fee for entering appraised value, §21-6-406.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 58, §§ 3-6, 8; Acts 1893, No. 12, § 1, p. 18; C. & M. Dig., §§ 276-279, 281; Pope's Dig., §§ 290-293, 295; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-1108 — 78-1111, 78-1113.

2-38-109. Bond of taker-up.

Every person taking up an animal as a stray shall, at the time of the appraisement, enter into bond to the State of Arkansas, with sufficient security to be approved by the justice of the peace who appoints the appraisers, in the value of the animal. The bond shall be conditioned that, if the owner of the animal within one (1) year from the date shall appear and prove his or her property in the animal so taken up, then the taker-up will deliver the animal or, if the owner should fail to prove his or her property therein within one (1) year, conditioned that he or she, the obligor, will pay into the county treasury one-half (½) of the appraised value, deducting all legal expenses of the animal, stating the amount of the appraisement.

If the animal is a hog, the conditions of the bond shall be that if the owner of the animal, within three (3) months from the date, shall appear and prove his or her property in the animal so taken up then he or she will deliver the animal or that if the owner should fail to prove his or her property therein within three (3) months, then he or she, the obligor, will pay into the county treasury one-half (½) of the appraised value, deducting all legal expenses of the animal.

History.

Acts 1843, § 38, p. 130; 1901, No. 204, § 1, p. 370; C. & M. Dig., § 280; Pope's Dig., § 294; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1112.

2-38-110. Records.

It is the duty of every clerk of the county court to keep a book in which he or she shall record all descriptions and valuations of animals taken. He or she shall also note on all bonds required to be deposited into his or her office under the provisions of this subchapter the time of filing them and keep the bonds safely for the use of the county.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 58, § 9; C. & M. Dig., § 282; Pope's Dig., § 296; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1114.

2-38-111. Advertisements to be posted.

The person taking up any animal under the provisions of this subchapter shall immediately make out, from the copy of the appraisement delivered to him or her by the justice of the peace, four (4) advertisements and put them up in the most public places in his or her township and county.

If any person shall fail to advertise any stray according to laws in force, he or she shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor. Upon conviction, an offender shall be fined in any sum not less than five dollars ($5.00) nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00), to be recovered by indictment or information in the county where the stray may have been taken up.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 58, § 10; Acts 1842, § 3, p. 25; C. & M. Dig., §§ 283, 302; Pope's Dig., §§ 297, 316; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-1115, 78-1118.

2-38-112. Publication in addition to posting.

If the animal taken up is a horse, mare, mule, jack, or jenny, the taker-up shall cause a copy of the description and appraisement to be inserted in some newspaper printed in the state for three (3) weeks if the animal is of the appraised value of at least twenty dollars ($20.00). Publication shall be commenced in the newspaper within one (1) month after appraisement. This shall be done in addition to the advertisement required by this subchapter.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 58, § 11; C. & M. Dig., § 284; Pope's Dig., § 298; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1116.

2-38-113. Payment of expenses.

If the owner of any stray horse, mare, mule, jack, or jenny does not prove the stray according to law within twenty (20) days from the time the animal was taken up, the person taking it up shall pay the county clerk all fees, the necessary postage, and the price of the advertisement. The clerk shall immediately transmit, by mail or otherwise, to the printer a copy of the appraisement of the stray and shall account to the printer for all money received by him or her for printing.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 58, § 25; Acts 1846, § 7, p. 28; C. & M. Dig., § 285; Pope's Dig., § 299; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1117.

2-38-114. Stray pen — Exhibition.

It is the duty of the county court, at the expense of the county, to provide a pound lot or stray pen sufficient to contain all stray horses, mares, mules, jacks, or jennies which may be taken up in their respective counties. The stray pen shall be within one-half (½) mile of the courthouse.

On the first day of the next term of the circuit court of his or her county, every person taking up any horse, mare, mule, jack, or jenny shall take the animal to the stray pen of his or her county and keep it there, subject to the inspection of all persons from 11:00 a.m. until 3:00 p.m. of each day.

Title to any of the animals mentioned in this section cannot be acquired by virtue of the stray laws unless the person taking it up exhibits it in the stray-pen of the county on the first day of the next term of the circuit court of his or her county. Smith v. Williams, 95 Ark. 587, 130 S.W. 168 (1910).

The person having the animal proved and required to be given up by the justice's order shall deliver it to the owner on receiving the amount of cost legally due and shall take a receipt endorsed on the justice's order for the animal.

The order and receipt shall be filed with the clerk of the county court of the proper county, upon the filing of which, the bond shall be deemed to be cancelled.

An appeal does not lie from an order of a justice of the peace made under this section. Langley v. Barkman, 23 Ark. (10 Barber) 293 (1861).

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 58, §§ 12, 13; C. & M. Dig., §§ 286, 287; Pope's Dig., §§ 300, 301; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-1119, 78-1120.

2-38-115. Reclamation by owner.

Within one (1) year from the time of the filing of the bond required by law, if the owner of any stray animal shall appear and claim it, he or she shall notify the taker-up; and the owner shall establish his or her claim to the animal before some justice of the peace of the county by such evidence as shall be satisfactory to the justice.

Upon the justice being satisfied of the ownership of the animal taken up, he or she shall make an order in writing requiring the taker-up of the animal to deliver it to the owner when he or she pays the legal costs that have accrued thereon.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 58, §§ 14-16; Acts 1842, § 1, p. 25; C. & M. Dig., §§ 288-290; Pope's Dig., §§ 302-304; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-1121 — 78-1123.

2-38-116. Refusal to deliver.

If any person who has taken up any animal shall refuse to deliver it to the owner on his or her having complied with the requirements of this subchapter, as respects proving ownership of the animal, the owner shall have a right of civil action. If the owner recovers in an action, he or she shall also recover double costs.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 58, § 18; C. & M. Dig., § 292; Pope's Dig., § 306; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1125.

Cross References. Replevin, §18-60-809.

2-38-117. Compensation for keeping strays.

No person shall charge anything for keeping any horse, mare, mule, jack, or jenny which may be worked or ridden while in the possession of the taker-up.

For the keeping of other animals, or the named animals if not worked or ridden, the person taking them up shall be entitled to a reasonable compensation to be adjudged by the justice of the peace before whom the owner proves his or her right of property.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 58, § 20; C. & M. Dig., § 293; Pope's Dig., § 307; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1126.

2-38-118. No premature disposition of strays.

No person taking up any animal shall sell, exchange, or dispose of it in any manner nor kill any domesticated cattle, hogs, or sheep until after the expiration of the time that the owner has the right to prove his or her property in them.

Any person violating the provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined in any sum not less than half nor more than double appraised value of the stray so taken up, to be recovered in the county where the stray may have been taken up.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 58, § 21; Acts 1842, § 2, p. 25; C. & M. Dig., §§ 294, 303; Pope's Dig., §§ 308, 317; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-1127, 78-1128.

2-38-119. Liability for death or escape of animals.

If any stray animals die or escape from the possession of the taker-up before the owner shall establish his or her right thereto, and if the death or escape is without the fault of the person having the lawful possession thereof, he or she shall not be liable for it.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 58, § 22; C. & M. Dig., § 295; Pope's Dig., § 309; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1129.

2-38-120. Forfeiture of right to animal.

If the owner of any stray animal does not appear and prove his or her property therein within one (1) year after the time of setting up the copies of the valuation and description of the animal and the filing of the bond required, he or she shall forfeit his or her right to the animal and the property shall be vested in the taker-up of it.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 58, § 17; C. & M. Dig., § 291; Pope's Dig., § 305; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1124.

2-38-121. Payment and filing required for unclaimed strays.

Every person who shall take up a stray animal which shall not be reclaimed by the owner within one (1) year shall pay into the county treasury of the county in which the stray was taken up one-half (½) of the residue after deducting all legal expenses from the appraised value of the animal and shall file the county treasurer's receipt for it in the office of the county clerk.

The county clerk shall charge the county treasurer with all such funds as shall be paid into the treasury; and

These funds shall be apportioned among the several districts of the county as other funds are apportioned.

After the term of one (1) year from the taking up of any animal, if the order of the justice of the peace requiring the taker-up of the animal to return the animal to the owner, with the owner's receipt thereon, shall not be filed with the clerk, or the one-half (½) of the appraised value paid into the treasury, and the county treasurer's receipt filed with the clerk, the clerk shall issue a notice to the delinquent to appear at the next session of the county court for that county and show cause, if any he or she can, why judgment shall not be entered against him or her, in favor of the state, for the benefit of the county.

The notice shall be delivered by the clerk to the sheriff and served by him or her on the person.

If no sufficient cause is shown, the court shall enter judgment against the delinquent for the amount due the county, with costs, and execution shall issue for it as in other cases.

The cause shall be tried without the necessity of formal pleadings.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 58, §§ 26-28; Acts 1845, § 1, p. 100; 1897, No. 40, § 1, p. 52; C. & M. Dig., §§ 297-300; Pope's Dig., §§ 311-314; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-1131 — 78-1134.

2-38-122. Judgment for costs.

If any person fails to file with the clerk of the county the treasurer's receipt or the receipt of the owner of the animal for which he or she executed his or her bond on taking it up, although he or she may have paid the amount due on the bond to the county treasurer or returned the animal in question to the proper owner, the court shall enter judgment against him or her for all costs.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 58, § 29; C. & M. Dig., § 301; Pope's Dig., § 315; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1135.

Subchapter 2

— Stallions, Mules, and Jacks

2-38-201. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning horses, mules, or jacks running at large, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 533. The section was derived from Rev. Stat., ch. 74, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 344; Pope's Dig., § 359; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1136.

2-38-202. Right of person taking up.

Any person may take up any seed horse, mule, or jack found running at large and, if not claimed within two (2) days, may castrate him.

For this service, he or she shall be entitled to recover from the owner of any horse, mule, or jack, three dollars ($3.00), which may be recovered in a civil action before any justice of the peace of the county.

Castration shall be done in the usual manner, so that the life of the animal shall be endangered as little as possible.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 74, §§ 2, 3; C. & M. Dig., §§ 345, 346; Pope's Dig., §§ 360, 361; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-1137, 78-1138.

2-38-203. Right to kill certain stock — Notice.

If any horse, mule, or jack is running at large and cannot be taken up, it may be killed, if notice is first put up at the courthouse and at three (3) other of the most public places in the county, for ten (10) days, describing the color, marks, and brands, as nearly as practicable, of the animal and that it will be killed unless taken away and secured.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 74, § 4; C. & M. Dig., § 347; Pope's Dig., § 362; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1139.

Subchapter 3

— Animals Covered by Initiated Acts

2-38-301. Running at large unlawful when prohibited.

In all counties of this state where there has been or may be submitted to the people by initiative petition a proposed act prohibiting horses, mules, cattle, hogs, sheep, and goats, or any of them, from running at large in the county and at an election held pursuant thereto, the electors voting thereon have enacted or shall enact such an act, it shall be unlawful from the effective date of the act for any animals, at any time during the year, to run at large and enter in and upon the fields and lands of the county, either enclosed or unenclosed.

In every case of trespass by an animal described and prohibited by the initiated act, the owner of the animal shall be liable, for all damages it may do, to the person owning crops, to be established and recovered in a civil action.

A lien shall exist against the animal in favor of the person whose crops may have been damaged or destroyed, and they may be sold under an order of the court rendering judgment for damages, to which shall be added any and all costs of taking up, feeding, and caring for the animal, and other costs.

Each day the animal continues to run at large shall constitute a separate offense.

When any initiated act duly adopted by the electors as provided prescribes penalties, the penalties of this section shall be cumulative and in addition to the penalties prescribed by the initiated act.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment, in (a)(2)(A), substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” and made gender neutral changes.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 199, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1140.

2-38-302. Penalty for failing to take up trespassing animals.

(1)Any owner of an animal upon receiving notice either verbal or otherwise that the animal is at large and trespassing upon the land, premises, and crops of another person shall immediately take up the animal and thereafter confine it so that further depredations and damages shall be avoided.

(A)If for twenty-four (24) hours after notification being given to him or her, the owner shall fail, neglect, or refuse to take up the animal upon being notified that his or her animal is running at large and trespassing, the owner shall be guilty of a violation and upon conviction shall be fined a sum not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00).

History.

Acts 1947, No. 199, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-1141, 78-1142; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 21.

2-38-303. Notice to owners of hogs and goats.

Hogs and goats when permitted to run at large are especially destructive of growing and unharvested crops of corn, oats, other small grains, and of winter cover crops; they are especially difficult and often practically impossible to catch and take up when preying upon these crops. To protect these crops, the animals must be removed or their destructiveness stopped without long delay. Therefore, a notice of twenty-four (24) hours shall be deemed sufficient to enable the owners of these animals to take up and confine them, the notice being sufficient if given verbally or otherwise to the owner, his or her agent, or his or her servant. If these animals are not taken up and confined, any person interested in the preservation of the crops either as landlord, tenant, cropper, or the agent or servant of either of them, may kill and destroy any offending hogs or goats and shall not be liable in damages for, or for the value of, the destroyed animals to any person because of having done so.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 199, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1143.

Subchapter 4

— Animals on Public Highways

Effective Dates. Acts 1955, No. 145, § 9: Mar. 4, 1955. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that animals running at large along and on the public highways of the State of Arkansas constitute a hazard to travelers upon said highways and have caused numerous highway accidents which have resulted in serious and painful injury and death to travelers upon the highway, and that the penalties provided for any person permitting animals to run at large upon the highway have been ineffective to eliminate this traffic hazard, and that there is urgent need for immediate action to render travel upon the highways less hazardous, and the enactment of this bill will reduce the hazards of highway travel. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety it shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

2-38-401. Purpose.

It is the purpose of this subchapter to provide for more effective enforcement of the prohibition against cattle, horses, mules, hogs, sheep, or goats being allowed to run at large along or on any public highway in the State of Arkansas in violation of §5-62-122.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 145, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1144.

2-38-402. Duty to impound.

It is the duty of the Department of Arkansas State Police and the sheriffs of the respective counties to restrain and impound any cattle, horses, mules, hogs, sheep, or goats found running at large along or on any public highway in the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 145, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1145.

2-38-403. Enclosures.

It is the duty of the county court of each county to provide an appropriate enclosure at the county farm or at some other place within the county for the impounding of cattle, horses, mules, hogs, sheep, or goats found running at large along or on any public highway in this state.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 145, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1146.

2-38-404. Delivery to enclosure.

Any member of the Department of Arkansas State Police or any sheriff or deputy sheriff of any county who discovers or is advised of an animal running at large along or on any public highway shall arrange for the animal to be taken up and delivered to the enclosure provided by the county court in the county where the animal is at large.

The cost of taking up and delivering the animal shall be borne by the county in which the animal is found running at large.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 145, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1147.

2-38-405. Notice of impounding.

When an animal found running at large along or on any public highway is delivered to the enclosure provided by the county court, the sheriff shall give notice of the impounding of the animal by causing a description of the animal to be inserted in some newspaper of general circulation in the county at least once a week for three (3) weeks. In addition to a description of the animal, the published notice shall also state the place where the animal was found running at large and the date and time of its being taken up.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 145, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1148.

2-38-406. Reclaiming by owner.

The owner of any animal impounded under the provisions of this subchapter shall be permitted at any time within thirty (30) days from the date of first publication of notice of the impounding of the animal to reclaim the animal upon the payment of all costs incurred by the county in connection with the taking up and delivery of the animal to the enclosure, the feeding and care of the animal while impounded, and the cost of publication of notice.

The animal shall be delivered to the owner if reclaimed in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter at the enclosure provided by the county court.

All costs in connection with the removal of the animal from the enclosure shall be borne by the owner.

The owner shall establish his or her claim to the animal before the sheriff by evidence as shall be satisfactory to the sheriff.

This section does not compel an owner of stock to be a witness against himself or herself in violation of Ark. Const., Art. 2, § 8, as it does not require an owner to reclaim his or her impounded stock but only permits it, and an owner by reclaiming his or her stock does not thereby admit that he or she has violated statutes prohibiting stock from running at large, as owner can only be guilty of violating these statutes if he or she knowingly permits his or her stock to run at large. Staples v. Bishop, 225 Ark. 936, 286 S.W.2d 505 (1956).

History.

Acts 1955, No. 145, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1149.

2-38-407. Sale of unclaimed animals.

If, at the expiration of thirty (30) days after notice was first posted, an animal found running at large along or on any public highway has not been claimed by its true owner, then it shall be the duty of the sheriff to sell the animal at public sale to the highest bidder after posting notice of sale in the courthouse for five (5) days.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 145, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1150.

2-38-408. Disposition of funds.

The county shall be entitled to one dollar ($1.00) per day for each animal found running at large along or on any public highway and impounded.

The sum shall be paid by the claimant-owner, as provided in § 2-38-406, or from the proceeds of the sale of the animal.

If there is a balance remaining after the expenses are deducted from the proceeds of the sale, the balance shall be deposited into a special fund in the name of the sheriff.

If the proceeds are not sufficient to pay the expenses incurred as provided in this section, the balance may be withdrawn from the fund provided for in subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

At the end of each calendar year, any balance in this fund shall be deposited with the county treasurer to the credit of the county road fund.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2017, No. 1010, §§1-3, provided:

“SECTION 1. Feral Hog Eradication Task Force.

“(a)The Feral Hog Eradication Task Force is created.

“(b)The task force shall be composed of:

“(1)The Director of the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission;

“(2)The Secretary of the Arkansas Agriculture Department;

“(3)The Deputy Director of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission;

“(4)The Executive Director of the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission;

“(5)The Director of the Department of Arkansas Heritage;

“(6)The Director of the Rural Services Division of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission;

“(7)The Director of the Department of Parks and Tourism;

“(8)The University of Arkansas System Division of Agriculture Vice-President for Agriculture or his or her designee; and

“(9)One (1) representative from each of the following groups:

“(A)Arkansas Association of Counties;

“(B)Arkansas Association of Conservation Districts;

“(C)Arkansas Farm Bureau Federation;

“(D)Arkansas Forestry Association;

“(E)Arkansas Pork Producers Association;

“(F)Nature Conservancy; and

“(G)Arkansas Dog Hunters Association.

“(c)The task force may add members to the task force as advisory members.

“(d)The Arkansas Agriculture Department shall provide office space, staff and materials for the task force.

“(e)The task force shall select from its membership a chair and a vice chair.

“(f)(1)A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.

“(2)A majority vote of those members present shall be required for any action of the task force.

“(g)If a vacancy occurs in an appointed position, the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.

“SECTION 2. Feral Hog Eradication Task Force — Duties.

“(a)The Feral Hog Eradication Task Force shall report on or before December 31, 2017, to the cochairs of the Legislative Council regarding the progress of the task force toward completing the project outlined in this section.

“(b)The task force shall create a plan for the eradication of feral hogs in Arkansas.

“(c)The plan created under this section shall include provisions for:

“(1)Controlling invasive feral hogs will take a long-term, cooperative approach with aggressive and effective strategies;

“(2)Four (4) tenets for effective population reduction and eradication efforts as the core principles to steer policy and guide the actions of the partnership, as follows:

“(A)Developing a multi-partner alliance to identify and address feral hog issues;

“(B)Increasing public understanding of the damage and harm caused by feral hogs;

“(C)Ensuring that sound regulatory mechanisms and enforcement capabilities exist to control illegal transport and release of feral hogs; and

“(D)Increasing resources for landowners and land managers to control feral hogs;

“(3)Developing and implementing of effective outreach tools to disseminate information to the public that defines the problems and issues associated with feral hogs;

“(4)Resolving ambiguities among existing statutes regarding livestock and feral hogs;

“(5)Appropriating, allocating, identifying, and pursuing known and alternative funding mechanisms to aid and administer the feral hog eradication program;

“(6)Strengthening existing possession and transport laws to increase penalties for persons convicted of transport and release of feral hogs;

“(7)Identifying:

“(A)Endangered and sensitive species; and

“(B)Critical, sensitive, or significant habitats, or eco-regions or counties, that have been damaged or are threatened by the negative impacts caused by feral hogs; and

“(8)Developing plans to:

“(A)Remediate feral hog damage; and

“(B)Remove feral hogs from feral-hog damaged areas using collaborative projects, tools, and funding for the benefit of the public and private lands and native flora and fauna held as public trust within those areas.

“SECTION 3. Expiration. This act expires on June 30, 2018.”

History.

Acts 1955, No. 145, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1151.

Subchapter 5

— Feral Hogs

2-38-501. Definition.

As used in this subchapter:

“Feral hog” means an animal or hybrid animal of either the family Suidae, including without limitation a wild hog, Russian or European wild boar, and Old World swine, or the family Tayassuidae, including without limitation peccary, javelina, and New World swine, that is or has been roaming freely upon public land or private land.

“Feral hog” does not include:

A stray domestic hog that has escaped from domestic confinement for less than:

Five (5) calendar days; or

Fifteen (15) calendar days if the owner of the stray domestic hog provides notice of the escape to all adjacent landowners within the first five (5) calendar days of the escape;

Amendments. The 2007 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2013 amendment redesignated and rewrote former (1) as (1)(A); rewrote (1)(B) and (1)(C); and substituted “a public nuisance” for “domestic livestock” in (2).

The 2019 amendment deleted former (1)(B) and redesignated former (1)(C) as (1)(B); and added (1)(B)(iii).

On private land if the person is the landowner or lessee or has the permission of the landowner or lessee;

On public land if:

Allowed by the landowning entity; and

The person possesses a valid Arkansas hunting license and complies with Arkansas hunting rules; or

After providing verification that he or she has a valid permit issued by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission in accordance with 16 U.S.C. § 742j-1, as it existed on January 1, 2019, upon determining that the permit applicant has a bona fide need to kill feral hogs for protection of land, water, wildlife, livestock, domesticated animals, human life, or crops, and not for a recreational hunting purpose.

A feral hog captured by any means under subsection (a) of this section shall be immediately killed.

If a feral hog is captured on private property and not moved from the privateproperty, the landowner or lessee is not required to kill the feral hog immediately.

A feral hog may be released into the wild only when the commission authorizes an employee of a state or federal agency to capture or release a feral hog, or both, for tracking or research purposes and with permission of the owner or lessee of the property.

Feral hogs that are captured for the purpose of tracking or research shall be killed upon completion of the tracking or research project.

A certified law enforcement officer or a public employee engaged in the performance of his or her official duties is exempt from the requirements under subdivisions (a)(2) and (3) of this section.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2015 amendment substituted “under” for “in accordance with” in the introductory language of (c); deleted former (c)(2)(B); redesignated former (c)(2)(C) as present (c)(2)(B); and inserted present (c)(2)(C).

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (c)(1) as (c)(1)(A) and added (c)(1)(B); substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (c)(2)(B); and substituted “rules adopted” for “regulations promulgated” in (c)(2)(C)(ii).

The 2019 amendment rewrote (a)(2); added (a)(3); rewrote (c); and added (d) and (e).

A hog held by a zoo accredited by the Association of Zoos and Aquariums or by the designated caretakers of the University of Arkansas mascot; or

A hog held while being transported to a livestock market or for slaughter and having a premises identification tag or other official eartag; and

A “feral hog” is deemed to be a public nuisance.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 457, § 1; 2007, No. 827, § 5; 2013, No. 1104, § 1; 2019, No. 991, § 1.

2-38-502. Capturing and killing feral hogs.

A person may capture or kill a feral hog only as follows:

A person whose hunting license is revoked shall not take or kill a feral hog during the period of the revocation.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 457, § 1; 2013, No. 1104, § 2; 2015, No. 723, § 1; 2017, No. 697, §
1; 2019, No. 991, § 2.

2-38-503. Animal health requirements.

A feral hog shall be subject to animal health requirements established by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 457, § 5.